California statutes. Insurance Code
(1) For a contracted financially interested provider that makes a third-party premium payment or has a financial relationship with the entity making the third-party premium payment, the amount of reimbursement for covered services that shall be paid to the financially interested provider on behalf of the insured shall be governed by the higher of the Medicare reimbursement or the rate determined pursuant to the process described in this subdivision, if a rate
 determination pursuant to that process is sought by either the provider or the health insurer. Financially interested providers shall neither bill the insured nor seek reimbursement from the insured for services provided, except for cost sharing pursuant to the terms and conditions of the insured’s health insurance policy. If an insured’s policy imposes a coinsurance payment for a claim that is subject to this paragraph, the coinsurance payment shall be based on the amount paid by the health insurer pursuant to this paragraph.

(2) For a noncontracting financially interested provider that makes a third-party premium payment or has a financial relationship with the entity making the third-party premium payment, the amount of reimbursement for covered services that shall be paid to the financially interested provider on behalf of the insured shall be governed by the terms and conditions of the insured’s health insurance policy or the rate
 determined pursuant to the process described in this subdivision, whichever is lower, if a rate determination pursuant to that process is sought by either the provider or the health insurer. Financially interested providers shall not bill the insured nor seek reimbursement from the insured for services provided, except for cost sharing pursuant to the terms and conditions of the insured’s health insurance policy. If the insured’s policy imposes a coinsurance payment for a claim that is subject to this paragraph, the coinsurance payment shall be based on the amount paid by the health insurer pursuant to this paragraph. A claim submitted to a health insurer by a noncontracting financially interested provider may be considered an incomplete claim and contested by the health insurer pursuant to Section 10123.13 or 10123.147 if the financially interested provider has not provided the information as required in subdivision (c).

(f) (1) By October 1, 2021, the department shall establish an independent dispute resolution process for the purpose of determining if the amount required to be reimbursed by subdivision (e) is appropriate.

(2) If either the provider or health insurer submits a claim to the department’s independent dispute resolution process, the other party shall participate in the independent dispute resolution process.

(3) In making its determination, the independent organization shall consider information submitted by either party regarding the actual cost to provide services, patient eligibility for Medicare or Medi-Cal, and the rate that would be paid by Medicare or Medi-Cal for patients eligible for those programs.

(4) The health insurer shall implement the determination obtained through the independent dispute
 resolution process. The independent organization’s determination of the amount required to be reimbursed shall apply for the duration of the policy year for that insured. If dissatisfied, either party may pursue any right, remedy, or penalty established under any other applicable law.

(5) In establishing the independent dispute resolution process, the department shall permit the bundling of claims submitted to the same insurer or the same delegated entity for the same or similar services. The department shall permit claims on behalf of multiple insureds from the same provider to the same health insurer to be combined into a single independent dispute resolution process.

(6) The department shall establish uniform written procedures for the submission, receipt, processing, and resolution of claim payment disputes pursuant to this section and any other guidelines for implementing
 this section.

(7) The department shall establish reasonable and necessary fees not to exceed the reasonable costs of administering this subdivision.

(8) The department may contract with one or more independent organizations to conduct the proceedings. The independent organization handling a dispute shall be independent of either party to the dispute.

(9) The department shall use conflict-of-interest standards consistent with the standards pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 10169.2.

(10) The department may contract with the same independent organization or organizations as the Department of Managed Health Care.

(11) The independent organization retained to conduct proceedings
 shall be deemed to be consultants for purposes of Section 43.98 of the Civil Code.

(12) Contracts entered into pursuant to the authority in this subdivision shall be exempt from Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.

(13) This subdivision does not alter a health insurer’s obligations under Section 10123.13.

(14) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by issuing guidance, without
 taking regulatory action, until regulations are adopted.

(g) For the purposes of this section, third-party premium payments only include health insurance premium payments made directly by a provider or other third party, made indirectly through payments to the individual for the purpose of making health insurance premium payments, or provided to one or more intermediaries with the intention that the funds be used to make health insurance premium payments for the individuals.

(h) The following definitions apply for purposes of this section:

(1) “Financially interested” includes any of the following entities:

(A) A provider of health care services that receives a direct or indirect financial benefit from a third-party premium payment.

(B) An entity that receives the majority of its funding from one or more financially interested providers of health care services, parent companies of providers of health care services, subsidiaries of health care service providers, or related entities.

(C) A chronic dialysis clinic that is operated, owned, or controlled by a parent entity or related entity that meets the definition of a large dialysis clinic organization (LDO) under the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services Comprehensive ESRD Care Model as of January 1, 2019. A chronic dialysis clinic that does not meet the definition of an LDO or has no more than 10 percent of California’s market share of licensed chronic dialysis clinics shall not be considered financially interested for purposes of this section.

(2) “Health insurance” means an
 individual or group health insurance policy as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 106. The term does not include coverage of Medicare services pursuant to contracts with the United States government, Medicare supplement coverage, or specialized health insurance coverage as described in subdivision (c) of Section 106.

(3) “Insured” means an individual whose health insurance premiums are paid by a financially interested entity.

(4) “Provider” means a professional person, organization, health facility, or other person or institution that delivers or furnishes health care services.

(i) The following shall occur if a health insurer subsequently discovers that a financially interested entity fails to provide disclosure pursuant to subdivision (c):

(1) The
 health insurer shall be entitled to recover 120 percent of the difference between payment made to a provider and the payment to which the provider would have been entitled pursuant to subdivision (e), including interest on that difference.

(2) The health insurer shall notify the department of the amount by which the provider was overpaid and shall remit to the department any amount exceeding the difference between the payment made to the provider and the payment to which the provider would have been entitled pursuant to subdivision (e), including interest on that difference that was recovered pursuant to paragraph (1).

(j) Commencing January 1, 2022, each health insurer licensed by the department and subject to this section shall provide to the department information regarding premium payments by financially interested entities and reimbursement for services to providers under
 subdivision (e). The information shall be provided at least annually at the discretion of the department and shall include, to the best of the health insurer’s knowledge, the number of insureds whose premiums were paid by financially interested entities, disclosures provided to the insurer pursuant to subdivision (c), the identities of any providers whose reimbursement rate was governed by subdivision (e), the identities of any providers who failed to provide disclosure as described in subdivision (c), and, at the discretion of the department, additional information necessary for the implementation of this section.

(k) This section does not limit the authority of the Attorney General to take action to enforce this section.

(l) This section does not affect a contracted payment rate for a provider who is not financially interested.

(m) This section does not alter any of a health insurer’s obligations and requirements under this part, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) The obligation of a health insurer to fairly and affirmatively offer, market, sell, and issue a health benefit plan to any individual, consistent with Chapter 9.9 (commencing with Section 10965), or small employer, consistent with Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 10700).

(2) The obligations of a health insurer with respect to cancellation or nonrenewal as provided in this part, including, but not limited to, Sections 10273.4, 10273.6, and 10273.7.

(3) A health insurer may not deny coverage to an insured whose premiums are paid by a third party.

(n) This section does not supersede or modify any privacy and information security requirements and protections in federal and state law regarding protected health information or personally identifiable information, including, but not limited to, the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg).

(o) Notwithstanding clause (iii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 10965.3, an insured’s loss of coverage due to a financially interested entity’s failure to pay premiums on a timely basis shall be deemed a triggering event for special enrollment pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 10965.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 218.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10177.

(a) A self-insured employee welfare benefit plan may provide for payment of professional mental health expenses upon a reimbursement basis, or for the exclusion of those services, and provision may be made therein for payment of all or a portion of the amount of charge for those services without requiring that the employee first pay those expenses. The plan shall not prohibit the employee from selecting any psychologist who is the holder of a certificate issued under Section 2948 of the Business and Professions Code or, upon referral by a physician and surgeon licensed under Section 2135 of the Business and Professions Code, any licensed clinical social worker who is the holder of a license issued under Section 4996 of the Business and Professions
 Code or any marriage and family therapist who is the holder of a certificate or license under Section 4980.50 of the Business and Professions Code, any professional clinical counselor who is the holder of a license under Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 4999.10) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, or any registered nurse licensed pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2700) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, who possesses a master’s degree in psychiatric-mental health nursing and is listed as a psychiatric-mental health nurse by the Board of Registered Nursing or any advanced practice registered nurse certified as a clinical nurse specialist pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 2838) of Chapter 6 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code who participates in expert clinical practice in the specialty of psychiatric-mental health nursing, to perform the particular services covered under the terms of the plan, the certificate or license holder being
 expressly authorized by law to perform these services.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow any certificate holder or licensee enumerated in this section to perform professional services beyond his or her field or fields of competence as established by his or her education, training, and experience.

(c) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Marriage and family therapist” shall mean a licensed marriage and family therapist who has received specific instruction in assessment, diagnosis, prognosis, and counseling, and psychotherapeutic treatment of premarital, marriage, family, and child relationship dysfunctions, which is equivalent to the instruction required for licensure on January 1, 1981.

(2) “Professional clinical counselor”
 means a licensed professional clinical counselor who has received specific instruction in assessment, diagnosis, prognosis, counseling, and psychotherapeutic treatment of mental and emotional disorders, which is equivalent to the instruction required for licensure on January 1, 2012.

(d) A self-insured employee welfare benefit plan, which is issued, renewed, or amended on or after January 1, 1988, that includes mental health services coverage in nongroup contracts may not include a lifetime waiver for that coverage with respect to any employee. The lifetime waiver of coverage provision shall be deemed unenforceable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 381, Sec. 39.   (SB 146)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10177.5.

A self-insured employee welfare benefit plan which is written or issued for delivery outside California in a state the laws of which require recognition of psychologists licensed in such state for services performed within the scope of psychological practice shall not be deemed to prohibit the insured from selecting a psychologist licensed in California to perform services in California which are covered under the terms of the policy even though such psychologist is not licensed in the state in which the insurance is written or issued for delivery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 558, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10177.6.

On and after the effective date of this section, a self-insured employee welfare benefit plan shall not prohibit the insured from selecting any person who is the holder of a certificate or license under Section 3055 of the Business and Professions Code to perform the particular services covered under the terms of the plan, such certificate holder or licensee being expressly authorized by law to perform such services.

This section shall not apply to any plan governed by federal law which expressly preempts state regulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1032, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10177.7.

On and after January 1, 1982, every self-insured employee welfare benefit plan which is issued, amended, delivered, or renewed that covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses on a group basis shall offer coverage for diabetic daycare self-management education programs, under such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon between the plan and the group policyholder, subject to utilization controls.

Coverage shall only apply to programs directed and supervised by a licensed physician who is board certified in internal medicine or pediatrics. Covered diabetic daycare self-managment and education programs shall be provided by health care professionals including, but not limited to, physicians, registered nurses, registered pharmacists, and registered dietitians who are knowledgeable about the disease process of diabetes and the treatment of diabetic patients.

As used in this section, diabetic daycare self-management education programs means instruction which will enable diabetic patients and their families to gain an understanding of the diabetic disease process, and the daily management of diabetic therapy thereby avoiding frequent hospitalizations and complications.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the offering of programs whose sole or primary purpose is weight reduction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 750, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10177.8.

(a) A self-insured employee welfare benefit plan doing business in this state and providing coverage that includes California residents but that may be written or issued for delivery outside of California where benefits are provided within the scope of practice of a licensed clinical social worker, a registered nurse licensed pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2700) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code who possesses a master’s degree in psychiatric-mental health nursing and two years of supervised experience in psychiatric-mental health nursing, a marriage and family therapist who is the holder of a license under Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 4980) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, or a
 professional clinical counselor who is the holder of a license under Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 4999.10) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, shall not be deemed to prohibit persons covered under the plan from selecting those licensees in California to perform the services in California that are within the terms of the contract even though the licensees are not licensed in the state where the contract is written or issued.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature in amending this section in the 1984 portion of the 1983–84 Legislative Session that persons covered by the plan and those providers of health care specified in this section who are licensed in California should be entitled to the benefits provided by the plan for services of those providers rendered to those persons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 381, Sec. 40.   (SB 146)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10177.9.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that all persons licensed in this state to engage in the practice of dentistry shall be accorded equal professional status and privileges, without regard to the degree earned. 

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no nonprofit hospital service plan or self-insured employee welfare benefit plan shall discriminate, with respect to employment, staff privileges, or the provision of, or contracts for, professional services, against a licensed dentist solely on the basis of the educational degree held by the dentist.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 729, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10178.

No admitted insurer, union trust fund which administers health, medical, or surgical insurance, or employer which has an insurance company administering its health services program, shall deny, for the reason that the insured incurred no expense, a claim for hospital, medical or surgical services rendered by a nongovernmental charitable research hospital in this state which makes no charge for its services in the absence of insurance. No expense-incurred, group hospital, medical or surgical policy or certificate or union trust fund which administers health, medical, or surgical insurance, or employer which has an insurance company administering its health services program, shall except, limit or reduce benefits for services rendered by a nongovernmental charitable research hospital because it does not charge for its services in the absence of insurance. No expense-incurred individual hospital, medical or surgical policy or certificate or union trust fund which administers health, medical, or surgical insurance, or employer which has an insurance company administering its health services program, shall except, limit, or reduce benefits for services rendered by a nongovernmental charitable research hospital because it does not charge for its services in the absence of insurance.

This section shall apply to every group policy or certificate of expense-incurred hospital, medical, or surgical insurance covering or delivered to a covered individual in this state, notwithstanding the situs of the group master policy pursuant to which the coverage is provided.

As used in this section, charitable research hospital means a hospital that meets all the following criteria:

(1) Is internationally recognized as devoting itself primarily to medical research.

(2) Expends not less than 10 percent of its operating budget in each fiscal year exclusively on medical research activities which are not directly related to the provision of services to patients.

(3) Derives not less than one-third of its gross revenues in each fiscal year from contributions, donations, grants, gifts, or other gratuitous forms from individuals, groups, persons, or entities unrelated to the hospital. Contributions, donations, grants, gifts or other gratuitous sources of revenue received as compensation for medical services provided patients shall not be considered for purposes of this subdivision.

(4) Accepts patients without regard to the patient’s ability to pay for medical services.

(5) Not less than two-thirds of the patients admitted have a primary diagnosis or suspected disease or condition directly related to the specific area or areas in which the hospital conducts research. Patients admitted because of an emergent life-threatening condition who could not be safely transported to another hospital shall not be considered as patients for purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 579, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10178.3.

(a) In order to prevent the improper selling, leasing, or transferring of a health care provider’s contract, it is the intent of the Legislature that every arrangement that results in a payor paying a health care provider a reduced rate for health care services based on the health care provider’s participation in a network or panel shall be disclosed to the provider in advance and that the payor shall actively encourage beneficiaries to use the network, unless the health care provider agrees to provide discounts without that active encouragement.

(b) Beginning July 1, 2000, every contracting agent that sells, leases, assigns, transfers, or conveys its list of contracted health care providers and their contracted reimbursement rates to a payor, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (d), or another contracting agent shall, upon entering or renewing a provider contract, do all of the following:

(1) Disclose whether the list of contracted providers may be sold, leased, transferred, or conveyed to other payors or other contracting agents, and specify whether those payors or contracting agents include workers’ compensation insurers or automobile insurers.

(2) Disclose what specific practices, if any, payors utilize to actively encourage a payor’s beneficiaries to use the list of contracted providers when obtaining medical care that entitles a payor to claim a contracted rate. For purposes of this paragraph, a payor is deemed to have actively encouraged its beneficiaries to use the list of contracted providers if one of the following occurs:

(A) The payor’s contract with subscribers or insureds offers beneficiaries direct financial incentives to use the list of contracted providers when obtaining medical care. “Financial incentives” means reduced copayments, reduced deductibles, premium discounts directly attributable to the use of a provider panel, or financial penalties directly attributable to the nonuse of a provider panel.

(B) The payor provides information to its beneficiaries, who are parties to the contract, or, in the case of workers’ compensation insurance, the employer, advising them of the existence of the list of contracted providers through the use of a variety of advertising or marketing approaches that supply the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of contracted providers to beneficiaries in advance of their selection of a health care provider, which approaches may include, but are not limited to, the use of provider directories, or the use of toll-free telephone numbers or Internet Web site addresses supplied directly to every beneficiary. However, Internet Web site addresses alone shall not be deemed to satisfy the requirements of this subparagraph. Nothing in this subparagraph shall prevent contracting agents or payors from providing only listings of providers located within a reasonable geographic range of a beneficiary.

(3) Disclose whether payors to which the list of contracted providers may be sold, leased, transferred, or conveyed may be permitted to pay a provider’s contracted rate without actively encouraging the payors’ beneficiaries to use the list of contracted providers when obtaining medical care. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to require a payor to actively encourage the payor’s beneficiaries to use the list of contracted providers when obtaining medical care in the case of an emergency.

(4) Disclose, upon the initial signing of a contract, and within 30 calendar days of receipt of a written request from a provider or provider panel, a payor summary of all payors currently eligible to claim a provider’s contracted rate due to the provider’s and payor’s respective written agreements with any contracting agent.

(5) Allow providers, upon the initial signing, renewal, or amendment of a provider contract, to decline to be included in any list of contracted providers that is sold, leased, transferred, or conveyed to payors that do not actively encourage the payors’ beneficiaries to use the list of contracted providers when obtaining medical care as described in paragraph (2). Each provider’s election under this paragraph shall be binding on the contracting agent with which the provider has a contract and any other contracting agent that buys, leases, or otherwise obtains the list of contracted providers. A provider shall not be excluded from any list of contracted providers that is sold, leased, transferred, or conveyed to payors that actively encourage the payors’ beneficiaries to use the list of contracted providers when obtaining medical care, based upon the provider’s refusal to be included on any list of contracted providers that is sold, leased, transferred, or conveyed to payors that do not actively encourage the payors’ beneficiaries to use the list of contracted providers when obtaining medical care.

(6) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to impose requirements or regulations upon payors, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (d).

(c) Beginning July 1, 2000, a payor, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (d), shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide an explanation of benefits or explanation of review that identifies the name of the network that has a written agreement signed by the provider whereby the payor is entitled, directly or indirectly, to pay a preferred rate for the services rendered.

(2) Demonstrate that it is entitled to pay a contracted rate within 30 business days of receipt of a written request from a provider who has received a claim payment from the payor. The failure of a payor to make the demonstration within 30 business days shall render the payor responsible for the amount that the payor would have been required to pay pursuant to the beneficiary’s policy with the payor, which amount shall be due and payable within 10 business days of receipt of written notice from the provider, and shall bar the payor from taking any future discounts from that provider without the provider’s express written consent until the payor can demonstrate to the provider that it is entitled to pay a contracted rate as provided in this subdivision. A payor shall be deemed to have demonstrated that it is entitled to pay a contracted rate if it complies with either of the following:

(A) Discloses the name of the network that has a written agreement with the provider whereby the provider agrees to accept discounted rates, and describes the specific practices the payor utilizes to comply with paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(B) Identifies the provider’s written agreement with a contracting agent whereby the provider agrees to be included on lists of contracted providers sold, leased, transferred, or conveyed to payors that do not actively encourage beneficiaries to use the list of contracted providers pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b).

(d) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Beneficiary” means:

(A) For automobile insurance, those persons covered under the medical payments portion of the insurance contract.

(B) For group or individual health services covered through a health care service plan contract, including a specialized health care service plan contract, or a policy of disability insurance that covers hospital, medical, or surgical benefits, a subscriber, an enrollee, a policyholder, or an insured.

(C) For workers’ compensation insurance, an employee seeking health care services for a work-related injury.

(2) “Contracting agent” means an insurer licensed under this code to provide disability insurance that covers hospital, medical, or surgical benefits, automobile insurance, or workers’ compensation insurance, while engaged, for monetary or other consideration, in the act of selling, leasing, transferring, assigning, or conveying a provider or provider panel to provide health care services to beneficiaries.

(3) (A) For the purposes of subdivision (b), “payor” means a health care service plan, including a specialized health care service plan, an insurer licensed under this code to provide disability insurance that covers hospital, medical, or surgical benefits, automobile insurance, or workers’ compensation insurance, or a self-insured employer that is responsible to pay for health care services provided to beneficiaries.

(B) For the purposes of subdivision (c), “payor” means only an insurer licensed under this code to provide disability insurance that covers hospital, medical, or surgical benefits, or automobile insurance, if that insurer is responsible to pay for health care services provided to beneficiaries.

(4) “Payor summary” means a written summary that includes the payor’s name and the type of plan, including, but not limited to, a group health plan, an automobile insurance plan, and a workers’ compensation insurance plan.

(5) “Provider” means any of the following:

(A) Any person licensed or certified pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code.

(B) Any person licensed pursuant to the Chiropractic Initiative Act or the Osteopathic Initiative Act.

(C) Any person licensed pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 1440) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(D) A clinic, health dispensary, or health facility licensed pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 1200) of the Health and Safety Code.

(E) Any entity exempt from licensure pursuant to Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 159, Sec. 145.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

10178.4.

(a) When a contracting agent sells, leases, or transfers a health provider’s contract to a payor, the rights and obligations of the provider shall be governed by the underlying contract between the health care provider and the contracting agent.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(1) “Contracting agent” has the meaning set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 10178.3.

(2) “Payor” has the meaning set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 10178.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 246.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

10178.5.

(a) Every self-insured employee welfare benefit plan issued, amended, or renewed on and after January 1, 1987, that offers coverage for medical transportation services, shall contain a provision providing for direct reimbursement to any provider of covered medical transportation services if the provider has not received payment for those services from any other source.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to any transaction between a provider of medical transportation services and a self-insured employee welfare benefit plan if the parties have entered into a contract providing for direct payment.

(c) For purposes of this subdivision, “direct reimbursement” means the following:

The insured shall file a claim for the medical transportation service with the plan; the plan shall pay the medical transportation provider directly; and the medical transportation provider shall not demand payment from the insured until having received payment from the plan, at which time the medical transportation provider may demand payment from the insured for any unpaid portion of the provider’s fee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 930, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10179.

A disability insurer that offers or provides coverage for any services that are legally within the scope of the practice of podiatric medicine, as defined in Section 2472 of the Business and Professions Code, as a specific plan benefit or otherwise, shall not refuse to give reasonable consideration to negotiating contracts with or affiliation with podiatrists for the provision of service solely on the basis that they are podiatrists.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 981, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10180.

(a) A disability insurer which negotiates and enters into a contract with professional providers to provide services at alternative rates of payment pursuant to Section 10133 of the Insurance Code, shall give reasonable consideration to timely written proposals for contracting by licensed or certified professional providers.

(b) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions are applicable:

(1) “Reasonable consideration” means consideration in good faith of the terms of proposals for contracting prior to the time that contracts for alternative rates of payment are entered into or renewed. An insurer may specify the terms and conditions of contracting to assure cost efficiency, qualification of providers, appropriate utilization of services, accessibility, convenience to persons who would receive the provider’s services, and consistency with its basic method of operation, but shall not exclude providers because of their category of license.

(2) “Professional provider” means a holder of a certificate or license under Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code, or any initiative act referred to therein, except for those certified or licensed pursuant to Article 3 of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2050) or Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 4800), who may, within the scope of their licenses, perform the services of a specific benefit defined in the insurer’s policy.

(c) An insurer which has a contract with an institutional provider or with professional providers is not required by this section to give consideration to contracting with professional providers who hold the same category of license or certificate and propose to serve a geographic area served adequately by the contracting providers that provide their professional services as employees or agents of that institutional or professional provider, or contract with that institutional or professional provider to provide professional services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 977, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Review of Rate Increases [10181. - 10181.14.]

10181.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) (1) “Blended” means a rating method that combines community rating and experience rating methods.

(2) “Community rated” means a rating method in the large group market that bases rates on the expected costs to a health insurer of providing covered benefits to all insureds, including both low-risk and high-risk insureds. Premiums may vary according to the factors in this article.

(3) “Experience rated” means a rating method in the large group market under which a health insurer
 calculates the premiums for a large group in whole or blended based on the group’s prior experience.

(b) (1) For individual and small group market products, “geographic region” has the same meaning as in Sections 10753.14 and 10965.9.

(2) For large group market products, “geographic region” means one of the following areas, composed of the regions defined in Sections 10753.14 and 10965.9:

(A) An area composed of regions 2, 4, 5, 6, 7, and 8, which consist of the Counties of Alameda, Contra Costa, Marin, Napa, San Mateo, Santa Clara, Solano, and Sonoma and the City and County of San Francisco.

(B) An area composed of regions 1 and 3,
 which consist of the Counties of Alpine, Amador, Butte, Calaveras, Colusa, Del Norte, El Dorado, Glenn, Humboldt, Lake, Lassen, Mendocino, Modoc, Nevada, Placer, Plumas, Sacramento, Shasta, Sierra, Siskiyou, Sutter, Tehama, Trinity, Tuolumne, Yolo, and Yuba.

(C) An area composed of regions 9 and 12, which consist of the Counties of Monterey, San Benito, San Luis Obispo, Santa Barbara, Santa Cruz, and Ventura.

(D) An area composed of regions 10, 11, and 14, which consist of the Counties of Fresno, Kern, Kings, Madera, Mariposa, Merced, San Joaquin, Stanislaus, and Tulare.

(E) An area composed of regions 13 and 17, which consist of the Counties of Imperial, Inyo, Mono, Riverside, and San Bernardino.

(F) An area composed of regions 15 and 16, which consist of the County of Los Angeles.

(G) An area composed of regions 18 and 19, which consist of the Counties of Orange and San Diego.

(c) “Large group health insurance policy” means a group health insurance policy other than a policy issued to a small employer, as defined in Section 10700, 10753, or 10755.

(d) “Small group health insurance policy” means a group health insurance policy issued to a small employer, as defined in Section 10700, 10753, or 10755.

(e) “PPACA” means Section 2794 of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec.
 300gg-94), as amended by the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), and any subsequent rules, regulations, or guidance issued pursuant to that law.

(f) “Unreasonable rate increase” has the same meaning as that term is defined in PPACA.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 807, Sec. 9.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10181.2.
